California, session 20252026, AB2628.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 32351 of the Government Code is amended to read:32351. Any A person retiring for service shall receive a pension payable in equal monthly installments during his their lifetime, equal to one-half of his the person’s terminal salary, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) a month. If a member is subject to the provisions of Section 32341 and does not exercise the option provided for therein, the amount shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month.